Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.385

Agency financial transaction account.

The agency financial transaction account is created in the state treasury. Receipts directed by law to the account from cost recovery charges for credit card and other financial transaction fees must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for paying credit card and financial transaction fees, and other related costs incurred by state agencies. During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, expenditures from the account may also be used for additional information technology costs related to supporting the department of licensing operations and addressing its staffing shortages.

[ 2022 c 186 s 703; 2021 c 32 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 186: See note following RCW 47.01.071.

Effective date—2021 c 32: See note following RCW 46.01.380.